Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2502XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 212 Section 1. Section 321.285, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. A reasonable and proper speed is required, but not 3 greater than fifty-five forty-five miles per hour at any time 4 between sunrise and sunset, and not greater than fifty miles 5 per hour at any time between sunset and sunrise , on secondary 6 roads unless such roads are surfaced with concrete or asphalt 7 or a combination of both, in which case the speed limits shall 8 be the same as provided in subsection 3 . When the board of 9 supervisors of any county shall determine determines upon 10 the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation that 11 the speed limit on any secondary road is greater than is 12 reasonable and proper under the conditions found to exist at 13 any intersection or other place or upon any part of a secondary 14 road, the board shall determine and declare a reasonable and 15 proper speed limit at the intersection or other part of the 16 secondary road. The speed limits as determined by the board 17 of supervisors shall be effective when appropriate signs 18 giving notice of the speed limits are erected by the board of 19 supervisors at the intersection or other place or part of the 20 highway. 21 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION. Notwithstanding section 22 321.252, 321.255, 321.285, or any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, when updating speed limit signs as a 24 result of the enactment of this Act, a county may attach 25 nonpermanent overlays or stickers approved by the department 26 of transportation to existing speed limit signs in order to 27 display the new speed limit. The nonpermanent overlays or 28 stickers may be used by the county until the applicable speed 29 limit sign is replaced based on the countyâs replacement 30 schedule and any applicable specifications or requirements. 31